Utah statutes.
30-3-12.   Courts to exercise family counseling  powers.

Each district court of the respective judicial districts, while sitting in matters of divorce, annulment, separate maintenance, child custody, alimony and support in connection therewith, child custody in habeas corpus proceedings, and adoptions, shall exercise the family counseling powers conferred by this act.



Amended by Chapter 72, 1969 General Session

